Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7
Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-7-101 — 24-7-206, 24-7-209 — 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-607, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-720, 24-7-723, 24-7-801, 24-7-803 — 24-7-901, 24-7-903 — 24-7-1312, and 24-7-1314 may not apply to §§ 24-7-207, 24-7-208, 24-7-504, 24-7-608, 24-7-721, 24-7-722, 24-7-726 — 24-7-729, 24-7-1313, 24-7-1315, and 24-7-1401 — 24-7-1409 where were enacted subsequently.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 271, § 11: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1995, No. 296, § 9: Feb. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the efficient operation of the state supported institutions of higher education that the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2017, No. 503, § 2: Mar. 15, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-7-101. Special allowances to encourage early retirement.

In order to effect a net savings in personnel costs paid by colleges and universities, the presidents and chancellors of the various publicly supported colleges and universities may, upon the approval of their respective boards of trustees, negotiate with tenured faculty members of their institutions so that, in order to secure the faculty members' early retirement, special allowances may be paid to them or into retirement plans for their benefit.

The board of trustees of each institution is authorized to pay such allowances as the board may approve from any appropriation provided for regular salaries for the benefit of its institution and from any source of funds available to its institution.

The amount of all such allowances for any institution shall not exceed, in the aggregate during any fiscal year, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the aggregate paid for personnel costs during the preceding fiscal year for the institution.

The board of trustees of each institution shall report the exact disposition of the special allowances to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee each year.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 271, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1465.

24-7-102. Management of early retirement window incentives.

The purpose of this section is to create incentives for the efficient management of the public higher education resources of the State of Arkansas by allowing public higher education institutions to establish early retirement window incentives for qualified nontenured faculty and staff who elect voluntary separation from the institution.

The boards of trustees of the publicly supported institutions of higher education may provide special allowances for nontenured faculty and staff to effect a saving in personnel salaries and fringe benefits costs when it is determined by the boards that such saving will provide for more efficient operation of the institutions.

The boards of trustees shall approve criteria to determine qualifications to be met by the institutions and the employee.

Such qualifications shall include, but are not limited to:

Assurance that participation is strictly voluntary for employees;

Only full-time employees who are at least fifty-five (55) years of age or meet the retirement requirements for the Civil Service Retirement System; and

A savings in personnel cost will be realized by the institution.

The amount of all such allowances for any institution shall not exceed, in the aggregate during any fiscal year, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the aggregate paid for personnel costs during the preceding fiscal year for the institution.

The boards of trustees are authorized to pay such allowances from any appropriation provided for regular salaries for the benefit of their institutions and from any sources of funds available to the institutions.

The board of trustees of each institution shall report the exact disposition of the special allowance to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee by July 1 of each year.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 296, §§ 1-5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Civil Service Retirement System, 5 U.S.C. § 2101, was replaced by the Federal Employees Retirement System (FERS) for federal employees who first entered covered service on and after January 1, 1987. See 5 U.S.C. § 8401 et seq.

24-7-103. Payment of employer contribution rate.

Local school districts shall pay the teacher retirement employer contribution rate for any eligible employee in accordance with rules established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1194, § 13; 2019, No. 315, § 2881.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began:

“Beginning with the 1996-97 school year”.

As enacted, this section ended:

“Furthermore, beginning in the 1996-97 fiscal year, the appropriation contained herein for Teacher Retirement Matching shall be used to provide the employer matching for employees of the Cooperative Education Services Areas, Vocational Centers and the school operated by the Department of Correction.”

Acts 2014, No. 293, § 27, provided:

“RETIREMENT MATCHING. Beginning with the 1996-97 school year, Local School Districts shall pay the teacher retirement employer contribution rate for any eligible employee in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Teacher Retirement Board of Directors. The appropriation contained herein for Teacher Retirement Matching each fiscal year shall be used to provide the employer matching for employees of the Cooperative Education Services Areas, Vocational Centers, Arkansas Easter Seals and the school operated by the Department of Correction.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1667, § 6 did not specifically amend or supersede this section.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

24-7-104. Employer early retirement incentives.

An employer's offer to encourage an employee to terminate his or her employment with the employer shall not include a requirement that the employee file an application for retirement with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 503, § 1.

24-7-105. Socially responsible investments.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or an alternate retirement plan of the system shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 767, § 1.